District of Columbia statutes.
44-781

Repealed

Admission of pay patients to Glenn Dale Hospital.

Repealed.

June 7, 1924, 43 Stat. 568, ch. 302, § 1
Feb. 24, 1984, D.C. Law 5-48, § 12(g), 30 DCR 5778
1981 Ed., § 32-111.
1973 Ed., § 32-310.